North Dakota, session 69, SB2024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
department of environmental quality for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department of
environmental quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $38,756,030 $4,479,208 $43,235,238
New and vacant FTE pool 0 2,290,870 2,290,870
Operating expenses 15,457,832 6,429,374 21,887,206
Capital assets 1,013,500 3,650,100 4,663,600
Grants 37,198,118 22,740,341 59,938,459
Total all funds $92,425,480 $39,589,893 $132,015,373
Less other funds 76,074,697 37,064,940 113,139,637
Total general fund $16,350,783 $2,524,953 $18,875,736
Full-time equivalent positions 173.00 2.00 175.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description Total Other Funds
Move to new chemistry laboratory $1,500,000
New chemistry laboratory capital assets 1,375,000
New chemistry laboratory operating expenses 700,186
Emerging contaminants program equipment 943,200
Petroleum tank database 700,000
State fuel inspection program capital assets 215,000
Water and wastewater operator certification program 5,000
Grand total other funds $5,438,386
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of environmental quality may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool
line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - ENVIRONMENT AND RANGELAND PROTECTION FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $250,000 from the environment and

S. B. NO. 2024 - PAGE 2
rangeland protection fund. This amount includes $50,000 for a grant to the North Dakota stockmen's
association environmental services program.
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - PETROLEUM TANK RELEASE COMPENSATION FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $1,827,025 from the petroleum tank
release compensation fund for expenses related to the petroleum tank release program.
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $3,575,186 from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for expenses related to moving into the new chemistry laboratory
and for chemistry laboratory operating expenses and equipment purchases.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 23.1-13-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23.1-13-16. Inspection fees.
Every person licensed by the tax commissioner as a motor vehicle fuel or special fuels dealer shall
pay to the tax commissioner an inspection fee of one-fortieth of one cent per gallon [3.79 liters] for
every gallon [3.79 liters] of gasoline, kerosene, tractor fuel, heating oil, or diesel fuel sold or used during
a calendar month except those gallons sold out of state or those gallons sold as original package sales
as defined in chapters 57-43.1 and 57-43.2. The fee must accompany the monthly report required in the
following section and is due no later than the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month for the preceding
month. The tax commissioner shall forward all money collected under this section to the state treasurer
monthly, and the state treasurer shall place the money in the general fund of the statedeposit the funds
in the department of environmental quality operating fund. The funds must be used, subject to
legislative appropriations, for the state fuel inspection program. The tax commissioner shall make
available annually a report by licensed dealer listing the number of gallons [liters] of motor vehicle fuel
and special fuels upon which the inspection fee has been paid. The provisions of chapters 57-43.1 and
57-43.2 pertaining to the administration of motor vehicle fuel and special fuels taxes not in conflict with
the provisions of this chapter govern the administration of the inspection fee levied by this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2024 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2024.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 77 Nays 16 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State